src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
LEXICON VARIÁNNTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ánnta with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* praktikánnta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *praktikánnta:* `praktikánnta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *praktikántas:* `praktikánnta+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON FANATISSMA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ssma with long and short compound-form.

* kabbalissma # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *kabbalissma:* `kabbalissma+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kabbalismas:* `kabbalissma+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TURISSTA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ssta with long and short compound-form. -lasj derivation is error taged.  Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* journalissta # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *journalissta:* `journalissta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *journalistas:* `journalissta+N+Sg+Ela`

### Loanwords becoming odd-syll

LEXICON PRIEMIJ_CMP_INFL  Assimilated loanwords. on -ie/-y, like premie and bandy. Become odd syllable loan words with cg, like "riebij". Nom: premij, gen prebmiha. Long and short essive.

* priemij # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *priemij:* `priemij+N+Sg+Nom`
* *premij:* `priemij+N+Sg+Nom`
* *priebmihis:* `priemij+N+Sg+Ela`
* *prebmihis:* `priemij+N+Sg+Ela`
* *priemin:* `priemij+N+Ess`
* *premin:* `priemij+N+Ess`
* *priebmihin:* `priemij+N+Ess`
* *prebmihin:* `priemij+N+Ess`

### Loanwords becoming contracted-syll

### See further down: ÅLMÅJ_LOAN

###  Error-lexicons, made to not get too many entries with both Err/Orth and correct

LEXICON A_CMP_INFL   Sub-forms. Lexicon for giving sub-variation conjugation by simply adding an -a to the norwegian/swedish word. No cg. Like "alkohola" and "agronoma". These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

LEXICON ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES  Even stem Err/orth lexicon without nominative, illative and essive. Only for entries with ERR/ORTH tag. Made so that we don't get entries that are both norm and with error tag. Entries like "ålggo" have no grade alternation, a common error is writing it like it has, ålggo>ålgov. tálla>tálav, klimáksa>klimáksav, prefiksa>prefiksav, barggo>barggov

LEXICON ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES2  Even stem Err/orth lexicon without nominative, illative and essive, AND ALSO  Sg+Gen, Sg+Ine, Pl+Nom, Pl+Com and Pl+Gen (to not get homonemies.

LEXICON ERR/ORTH_EVEN_STRONG_CASES   Even stem Err/orth lexicon with only nominative, illative and essive. Only for entries with ERR/ORTH tag. Made so that we don't get entries that are both norm and with error tag. Hydrogena is used as nom and is err/orth, hydrogena>hydrogenav is not err/orth. marináda-nom, banána-nom

LEXICON ERR/ORTH_ODD  Err/Orth lexicon doing the opposit of what odd-syllable nouns do. Strong grade in nom and weak in all other.

* dálkas # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *dálkkas* `dálkas+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom`
* *dálkasav* `dálkas+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc`
* *dálkasasj* `dálkas+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`

###  Badly assimilated loanwords

LEXICON NOADE_BADASS  2 syll stems without cg. Badly or wrongly assimilated words, ie. assimilated in a way that isn't lulesami. (Same as NOADE) Most of the words are Err/Orth tagged with a standardized lemma. Some are Err/Lex tagged, 5.9.2019: EJP/SNM: fjerna +Use/-Spell - sjølv om vi ikkje likar orda, så vil vi sjå til at dei blir skrive rett etter smj-ortografien! Dei fleste orda er uansett merka med +Err/Orth :)

* balláda # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *balláda* `balláda+N+Sg+Nom`
* *balládas* `balláda+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON C_ILL_IJ_BADASS  Badly or wrongly assimilated words. Last letter is consonant, no cg, no vowchange, with illative -ij. (Same as GAHPER) Assimilated in a way that isn't lulesami. Most of the words are Err/Orth tagged with a standardized lemma. Some are Err/Lex tagged, and some only recieve the +Use/-Spell tag from the lexicon.

* sentimehter # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *sentimehter* `sentimehter+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sentimehteris* `sentimehter+N+Sg+Ela`
* *sentimehterij* `sentimehter+N+Sg+Ill`

LEXICON C_ILL_AJ_BADASS  Badly or wrongly assimilated words. Last letter in consonant, no cg, no vowchange, with illative -aj. Should have been assimilated to even-syll, but are used as odd-syll, and mostly just assimilated with changing to letter á. So almosed same as CELSIUS_UNASS.

* kálsium # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *kálsium* `kálsium+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kálsiumas* `kálsium+N+Sg+Ela`
* *kálsiumaj* `kálsium+N+Sg+Ill`

###  Unassimilated loanwords

LEXICON KINO_UNASS_CMP_INFL  V-final unassimilated loanwords. Not lulesami. No diacritics whatsoever. Words that aren't assimilated at all. Really just norwegian words with a kind of sami inflection. Get even syllable case marking. Are part of the spell checker.

* netto # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *netto:* `netto+N+Sg+Nom`
* *nettos:* `netto+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON C_ILL_IJ_UNASS  C-final unassimilated loanwords, gives illative- ij. Not lulesami. No diacritics whatsoever. Really just foreign words with a kind of sami inflection. Odd syllable case marking (like GAHPER). Are part of the spell checker. 

* sirkus # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *sirkus:* `sirkus+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sirkusij:* `sirkus+N+Sg+Ill`
* *sirkusis:* `sirkus+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON C_ILL_AJ_UNASS  C-final unassimilated loanwords, gives illativ -aj. Also odd-syll words ending on letter i, as selleri. Not lulesami. No diacritics whatsoever. Really just norwegian words with a kind of sami inflection. Case marking like standard even 4 syllable stems (see proper nouns file on the case marking of foreign words with stressed last syllable). Are part of the spell checker. 

* aids # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *aids:* `aids+N+Sg+Nom`
* *aidsaj:* `aids+N+Sg+Ill`
* *aidsas:* `aids+N+Sg+Ela`
* *aidsan:* `aids+N+Ess`
* *aidsadak:* `aids+N+Abe`
* *aidsada:* `aids+N+Abe`
* *aidsasj:* `aids+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`

+Der4+Der/ahtes:e»g AHTES ; Only for odd-syllble stems

### 4syll stems 

LEXICON GÅNÅGIS  Standard C-final 4-syllabic stems

* rahtjamus # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *rahtjamus:* `rahtjamus+N+Sg+Nom`
* *rahtjamussaj:* `rahtjamus+N+Sg+Ill`
* *rahtjamusás:* `rahtjamus+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERULASJ  For words ending on -asj. Same as GÅNÅGIS but with strong essive and illative -adjtan and -adtjaj subtaged, same with PX "-adjtam". These forms are barely used today. -lahttja is also Err/Orth-taged.

LEXICON BEDNAGASJ  Like BERULASJ, but for derived nouns in diminutive. No cg, no vowchange, no short Ess. Has only one dimin derivation since these words already are dimin, ie. no double dim as for GAHPER. No abessive, not totally sure about this, I think we must use postposition dagi when it's diminutive,

* stiebil # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *bednagasj:* `bednagasj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *bednagattjas:* `bednagasj+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON HÁVSAGUSJ  Like BEDNAGASJ, but not diminutive. No cg, no vowchange, no short Ess. Has only one dimin derivation. No abessive, not totally sure about this, I think we must use postposition dagi when it's diminutive,

LEXICON JIHPELIJ  gen:jihpelahá

* gehtsulij # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *gehtsulij:* `gehtsulij+N+Sg+Nom`
* *gehtsulaháv:* `gehtsulij+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON OARJJILIJ  gen:oarjjilihá

* allilij # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *allilij:* `allilij+N+Sg+Nom`
* *allilihás:* `allilij+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON VIESSOMUJ  gen:viessumuhá

* bårråmuj # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *bårråmuj:* `bårråmuj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *bårråmuháj:* `bårråmuj+N+Sg+Ill`

### 4 syllable plurals

LEXICON OADÁDAGÁ  Plural forms of words like tjerastahka with short compound-form

* látjádagá # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *látjádagá:* `látjádagá+N+Pl+Nom`
* *látjádagájs:* `látjádagá+N+Pl+Ela`

LEXICON BERRAHATTJA  Plural stems. Like IEDNITJA, these do not have corresponding singular stems. Most stems here have the same form as the pl nom form of diminutive derivations, but (while it may have originated as a diminuitive derivation) it is not the same derivation (today) and it does not have a singular form.

* gahpanisá # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *gahpanisá:* `gahpanisá+N+Pl+Nom`
* *gahpanisájda:* `gahpanisá+N+Pl+Ill`
* *gahpanisájs:* `gahpanisá+N+Pl+Ela`

LEXICON SIJDDALAHÁ   Plurals

* lullelahá # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *lullelahá:* `lullelahá+N+Pl+Nom`
* *lullelahájt:* `lullelahá+N+Pl+Acc`

 LEXICON SISSNELUHÁ   plurals. presently only for sissŋeluhá

* sissŋeluhá # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *sissŋeluhá:* `sissŋeluhá+N+Pl+Nom`
* *sissŋeluhájda:* `sissŋeluhá+N+Pl+Ill`

LEXICON DAGI_SINGULAR  Earlier we generated "bijladagi" and bijlajdagi as abbessiv. This has been fixed, but to be able to analyse what we earlier generated, we needed this lexicon. Only singular. Gives Err/tag to "bijladagi" and makes correct "bijla dagi".

LEXICON DAGI_PLURAL  Earlier we generated "bijladagi" and bijlajdagi as abbessiv. This has been fixed, but to be able to analyse what we earlier generated, we needed this lexicon. Only plural. Gives Err/tag to "bijlajdagi" and makes correct "bijlaj dagi".

### Adjectival sublexicas. Give 4 syll adjectives inflection

LEXICON SURGULASJ-EVEN 

LEXICON N-EVENWEAKSTEM-NO-ABE  same as N-EVENWEAKSTEM but without abessive (abessive it Err/Infl-taged). Used for 4-syll nouns

### Compound lexicas

## Odd-syllable stems

### without cg

LEXICON GAHPER  Odd-syllable C-final noun without cg, no vowchange, no short Ess. Spiik A3

* stiebil # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *stiebil:* `stiebil+N+Sg+Nom`
* *stiebilis:* `stiebil+N+Sg+Ela`

### with cg

LEXICON ÅRES  Odd-syllable C-final noun with CG, 2ndsyll vowchange. Long and short essive. Spiik A1

* sjattos # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *sjattos:* `sjattos+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sjaddusis:* `sjattos+N+Sg+Ela`
* *sjaddusin:* `sjattos+N+Ess`
* *sjatton:* `sjattos+N+Ess`

LEXICON SÅHKÅR  Odd-syllable C-final noun with CG and 2ndsyll vowelchange. Has only long essive. Spiik 2b

* spiger # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *spiger:* `spiger+N+Sg+Nom`
* *spihkáris:* `spiger+N+Sg+Ela`
* *spihkárin:* `spiger+N+Ess`

LEXICON MIEHTAR  Only for word "miehtar". Same as SÅHKÅR but with Area-differences and a lot of Err/Orths. 

* miehtar # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *miehtar:* `miehtar+N+Sg+Nom`
* *mehtar:* `miehtar+N+Sg+Nom`
* *miehttaris:* `miehtar+N+Sg+Ela`
* *mähttaris:* `miehtar+N+Sg+Ela`
* *mähttarin:* `miehtar+N+Ess`
* *miehttarin:* `miehtar+N+Ess`

LEXICON GÁMAS  Odd-syllable C-final noun with CG, no 2ndsyll vowchange (OBS: a does not change). Long and short essive. Spiik A2

* sjábtjas # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *sjábtjas:* `sjábtjas+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sjábttjasis:* `sjábtjas+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BENA  Odd-syllable V-final noun with cg, no 2nsyll vowchange. Deletes g. Long and short essive. Spiik 2a

* galma # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *galma:* `galma+N+Sg+Nom`
* *galmmagis:* `galma+N+Sg+Ela`

## Irregular stems

LEXICON SUOBDE   gen: suobddega.  Presently only for "suobde". For some reason -e dosn't become á. So not in lexicon BENA. Long and short essive.

* ságe # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *ságe:* `ságe+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sáhkahav:* `ságe+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON SÁGE   gen: sáhkaha.  Presently only for "ságe". Long and short essive.

* ságe # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *ságe:* `ságe+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sáhkahav:* `ságe+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON BAVSEV   Ends on -v and last vowel changes to i: bavsev:baksIma. Not like gierkav gierkkAma and birev birEma.

* sievtev # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *sievtev:* `sievtev+N+Sg+Nom`
* *siektimis:* `sievtev+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON RÁBEV  rábev:ráhpuga. Presently only for "rábev".

* rábev # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *rábev:* `rábev+N+Sg+Nom`
* *ráhpugis:* `rábev+N+Sg+Ela`
